en: Applique/Patch shape: Abstract; Animal; Figure; Floral; Geometric; Letter; Number; Sport accessory; Symbol; Other
nb: Form på applikasjon/lapping: Abstrakt; Dyr; Figur; Blomster; Geometrisk; Brev; Antall; Sportstilbehør; Symbol; Annet
zh-CN: 贴花/贴片形状: 抽象; 动物; 数字; 花型; 几何图形; 信纸; 数字; 运动配件; 符号; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на апликацията/пача: Абстрактен; Животно; Фигура; Флорален; Геометричен; Писмо; Номер; Спортен аксесоар; Символ; Други
sl-SI: Oblika našitka/zaplate: Abstraktno; Žival; Oblike; Cvetlično; Geometrijsko; Črka; Številka; Športni dodatek; Simbol; Drugo
de: Form der Applikation/des Patchs: Abstrakt; Tier; Figur; Blumenmuster; Geometrisch; Letter; Zahl; Sportzubehör; Symbol; Sonstiges
tr: Aplike/Yama şekli: Soyut; Hayvan; Figür; Çiçek; Geometrik; Mektup; Sayı; Spor tipi aksesuar; Sembol; Diğer
sk-SK: Tvar nášivky/záplaty: Abstraktný; Zviera; Postava; Kvetinový; Geometrický; List; Číslo; Športový doplnok; Symbol; Iné
pt-BR: Forma do aplique/adorno: Abstrato; Animal; Figura; Floral; Geométrico; Carta; Número; Acessório esportivo; Símbolo; Outro
zh-TW: 貼花/貼片形狀: 抽象; 動物; 圖形; 花卉; 幾何的; Letter; 數位; 運動配件; 符號; 其他
nl: Appliqué-/patch-vorm: Abstract; Dier; Figuur; Gebloemd; Geometrisch; Letter; Nummer; Sportaccessoire; Symbool; Andere
hu: Hímzés/folt formája: Absztrakt; Állatos; Ábrák; Virágos; Geometriai; Betűk; Számok; Sportkellékek; Szimbólumok; Egyéb
da: Applikation/lappeform: Abstrakt; Dyr; Figur; Blomster; Geometrisk; Brev; Nummer; Sportstilbehør; Symbol; Andet
es: Forma de aplique/parche: Abstracto; Animal; Figura; Floral; Geométrico; Carta; Número; Accesorio deportivo; Símbolo; Otros
fi: Applikaation/paikan muoto: Abstrakti; Eläin; Figuuri; Kukikas; Geometrinen; Kirje; Numero; Urheilutarvike; Symboli; Muu
lt-LT: Lipduko / lopo forma: Abstraktus; Gyvūnas; Figūra; Gėlių; Geometrinė; Raidė; Skaičius; Sporto priedai; Simbolis; Kita
pl: Kształt aplikacji/łaty: Abstrakt; Zwierzęcy; Rysunek; Kwiatowy; Geometryczny; Letter; Liczba; Akcesoria sportowe; Symbol; Inne
ru: Форма аппликации или нашивки: Абстрактная; Животное; Фигура; Цветочная; Геометрическая; Буква; Цифра; Спортивный аксессуар; Символ; Другое
ko: 아플리케/패치 모양: 추상; 동물; 수치; 꽃; 기하학; 레터; 숫자; 스포츠 액세서리; 상징; 기타
vi: Hình dạng đính/vá: Trừu tượng; Động vật; Hình người; Hoa cỏ; Hình học; Letter; Số; Phụ kiện thể thao; Biểu tượng; Khác
cs: Tvar nášivky/záplaty: Abstraktní; Zvíře; Postava; Květinový; Geometrický; Letter; Číslo; Doplněk na sport; Symbol; Jiné
hr-HR: Oblik prišivka / ukrasne zakrpe: Apstraktni; Životinja; Lik; Cvjetni; Geometrijski; Slovo; Broj; Sportski dodatak; Simbol; Ostalo
ja: アップリケ/パッチワークの形: 抽象的; 動物; 形; フローラル; ジオメトリック; レター; 数字; スポーツ関連; シンボル; その他
fr: Forme d’applique/patch: Abstrait; Animal; Chiffre; Floral; Géométriques; Lettre; Nombre; Accessoire sportif; Symbole; Autre
th: รูปร่างของศิลปะการปะติด/แผ่นแปะ: นามธรรม; สัตว์; ฟิกเกอร์; ลายดอก; ลายเรขาคณิต; จดหมาย; ตัวเลข; อุปกรณ์เสริมกีฬา; เครื่องหมาย; อื่นๆ
it: Forma dell’applique/toppa: Astratto; Animale; Figura; Floreale; Geometrico; Lettera; Numero; Accessorio per lo sport; Simbolo; Altro
sv: Form på applikation/lapp: Abstrakt; Djur; Figur; Blommig; Geometrisk; Brev; Siffra; Sporttaccessoar; Symbol; Övrigt
el: Σχήμα απλικέ/επιρράματος: Αφηρημένο; Ζώο; Μορφή; Φλοράλ; Γεωμετρικό; Γράμμα; Αριθμός; Αθλητικό αξεσουάρ; Σύμβολο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Formă inserție/petic: Abstract; Animal; Figurină; Floral; Geometric; Literă; Număr; Accesoriu sport; Simbol; Altele
pt-PT: Formato de aplique/remendo: Abstrato; Animal; Figura; Floral; Geométrico; Carta; Número; Acessório desportivo; Símbolo; Outro